Tennessee, session 114, SB1972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 58, Chapter 3, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
53-3-201. Short title.
This part is known and may be cited as the 'Tennessee Veteran Protection and
Due Process Act."
53-3-202. Part definitions.
As used in this part:
SB1972
011303
- 1 -

(1) "Immigration enforcement action" means an action by federal
immigration and customs enforcement agents to enforce federal immigration
laws;
(2) "Proof of veteran status" includes a DD-214, military ID, VA records,
or credible sworn documentation; and
(3) "Veteran" means a person who served in the United States armed
forces and was discharged under honorable or general conditions.
53-3-203. Prohibition on state assistance in veteran deportation.
(a) A state or local law enforcement agency shall not assist, participate in, or
facilitate an immigration enforcement action against an individual unless the requesting
federal authority certifies in writing that:
(1) The individual is not a veteran of the United States armed forces; or
(2) The individual's veteran status has been reviewed and confirmed by
the United States department of veterans affairs.
(b) Absent such certification, all state assistance in an immigration enforcement
action must be withheld.
53-3-204. Mandatory veteran status screening.
(a) Prior to honoring any immigration detainer or transfer request, a state or local
law enforcement agency shall:
(1) Ask whether the individual has served in the United States armed
forces; and
(2) Conduct a good-faith review of available records to determine
whether the individual is a veteran.
(b) If veteran status is indicated, the individual must not be transferred until
verification is completed.
- 2 - 011303

53-3-205. Judicial safeguards.
A state or local law enforcement officer shall not assist in the detention or
transfer of a veteran for immigration purposes unless presented with:
(1) A valid judicial warrant; and
(2) Written certification from the agency requesting the transfer that
veteran-specific immigration relief has been considered.
53-3-206. Access to counsel and benefits.
(a) A veteran subject to immigration proceedings while in state custody must be:
(1) Informed of the right to consult an attorney knowledgeable in military-
related immigration relief; and
(2) Permitted reasonable access to records necessary to establish
service in the United States armed forces.
(b) This part does not deny state or federal veterans' benefits pending
verification.
53-3-207. Enforcement.
(a) Any evidence obtained in violation of this part is inadmissible in state
proceedings.
(b) A person affected by a violation of this part may bring an action for injunctive
or declaratory relief.
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011303